Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-922.01
County board; rights-of-way; manner of acquisition.

The county board, in constructing a drainage improvement under the provisions of sections 31-901 to 31-933, may procure rights-of-way by purchase, gift, or by exercise of the right of eminent domain in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1961, c. 144, § 2, p. 421.